North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 2. Licensure of Facilities for Individuals With Mental Health Disorders, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Disorders.
§ 122C-24.1.
Penalties; remedies.

Violation Classification and Penalties. — The Department of Health and Human Services shall impose an administrative penalty in accordance with provisions of this Article on any facility licensed under this Article which is found to be in violation of Article 2 or 3 of this Chapter or applicable State and federal laws and regulations. Citations for violations shall be classified and penalties assessed according to the nature of the violation as follows:

“Type A1 Violation” means a violation by a facility of the regulations, standards, and requirements set forth in Article 2 or 3 of this Chapter or applicable State or federal laws and regulations governing the licensure or certification of a facility which results in death or serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation. The person making the findings shall do the following:

Orally and immediately inform the facility of the Type A1 Violation and the specific findings.

a1.

Require a written plan of protection regarding how the facility will immediately abate the Type A1 Violation in order to protect clients from further risk or additional harm.

Within 15 working days of the investigation, send a report of the findings to the facility.

Require a plan of correction to be submitted to the Department, based on a written report of the findings, that describes steps the facility will take to achieve and maintain compliance.

The Department shall impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each Type Al Violation in facilities or programs that serve six or fewer persons. The Department shall impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each Type A1 Violation in facilities or programs that serve seven or more persons. Where a facility has failed to correct a Type A1 Violation, the Department shall access the facility a civil penalty in the amount of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation continues beyond the time specified for correction. The Department or its authorized representative shall determine whether the violation has been corrected.

(1a)

“Type A2 Violation” means a violation by a facility of the regulations, standards, and requirements set forth in Article 2 or 3 of this Chapter or applicable State or federal laws and regulations governing the licensure or certification of a facility which results in substantial risk that death or serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation will occur. The person making the findings shall do the following:

a.

Orally and immediately inform the facility of the Type A2 Violation and the specific findings.

b.

Require a written plan of protection regarding how the facility will immediately abate the Type A2 Violation in order to protect clients or residents from further risk or additional harm.

c.

Within 15 working days of the investigation, send a report of the findings to the facility.

Require a plan of correction to be submitted to the Department, based on the written report of the findings, that describes steps the facility will take to achieve and maintain compliance.

The violation or violations shall be corrected within the time specified for correction by the Department or its authorized representative. The Department may or may not assess a penalty taking into consideration the compliance history, preventative measures, and response to previous violations by the facility. Where a facility has failed to correct a Type A2 Violation, the Department shall assess the facility a civil penalty in the amount of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the deficiency continues beyond the time specified for correction by the Department or its authorized representative. The Department or its authorized representative shall determine whether the violation has been corrected.

(1b)

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-50, s. 1, effective June 30, 2016.

“Type B Violation” means a violation by a facility of the regulations, standards, and requirements set forth in Article 2 or 3 of this Chapter or applicable State or federal laws and regulations governing the licensure or certification of a facility which is detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of any client or patient, but which does not result in substantial risk that death or serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation will occur. The person making the findings shall do the following:

Orally and immediately inform the facility of the Type B Violation and the specific findings.

Require a written plan of protection regarding how the facility will immediately abate the Type B Violation in order to protect clients or residents from further risk or additional harm.

Within 15 working days of the investigation, send a report of the findings to the facility.

Require a plan of correction to be submitted to the Department, based on the written report of the findings, that describes steps the facility will take to achieve and maintain compliance.

Where a facility has failed to correct a Type B Violation within the time specified for correction by the Department or its authorized representative, the Department shall assess the facility a civil penalty in the amount of up to four hundred dollars ($400.00) for each day that the violation continues beyond the date specified for correction without just reason for the failure. The Department or its authorized representative shall ensure that the violation has been corrected.

(2a)

A Type A1, Type A2, or Type B Violation as defined above shall not include a violation by a facility of the regulations, standards, and requirements set forth in Article 2 or 3 of this Chapter or applicable State or federal laws and regulations governing the licensure or certification of a facility if all of the following criteria are met:

a.

The violation was discovered by the facility.

b.

The Department determines that the violation was abated immediately.

c.

The violation was corrected prior to inspection by the Department.

d.

The Department determines that reasonable preventative measures were in place prior to the violation.

The Department determines that subsequent to the violation, the facility implemented corrective measures to achieve and maintain compliance.

(2b)

As used in this section, “substantial risk” shall mean the risk of an outcome that is substantially certain to materialize if immediate action is not taken.

Repeat Violations. — The Department shall impose a civil penalty which is treble the amount assessed under this subsection when a facility under the same management or ownership has received a citation during the previous 12 months for which the appeal rights are exhausted and penalty payment is expected or has occurred, and the current violation is for the same specific provision of a statute or regulation for which it received a violation during the previous 12 months.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-249, s. 1, effective June 23, 2011.

Factors to Be Considered in Determining Amount of Initial Penalty. — In determining the amount of the initial penalty to be imposed under this section, the Department shall consider the following factors:

There is substantial risk that serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation will occur, and this has not been corrected within the time specified by the Department or its authorized representative;

Serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation, without substantial risk for client death, did occur;

Serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation, with substantial risk for client death, did occur;

(3a)

A client died;

(3b)

A client died and there is substantial risk to others for serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

(3c)

A client died and there is substantial risk for further client death;

The reasonable diligence exercised by the licensee to comply with

G.S. 131E-256

and other applicable State and federal laws and regulations;

Efforts by the licensee to correct violations;

The number and type of previous violations committed by the licensee within the past 36 months; and

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-249, s. 1, effective June 23, 2011.

The number of clients or patients put at risk by the violation.

The facts found to support the factors in subsection (c) of this section shall be the basis in determining the amount of the penalty. The Department shall document the findings in written record and shall make the written record available to all affected parties including:

The licensee involved;

The clients or patients affected; and

The family members or guardians of the clients or patients affected.

The Department shall impose a civil penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) per day on any facility which refuses to allow an authorized representative of the Department to inspect the premises and records of the facility.

Any facility wishing to contest a penalty shall be entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A petition for a contested case shall be filed within 30 days after the Department mails a notice of penalty to a licensee. At least the following specific issues shall be addressed at the administrative hearing:

The reasonableness of the amount of any civil penalty assessed, and

The degree to which each factor has been evaluated pursuant to subsection (c) of this section to be considered in determining the amount of an initial penalty.If a civil penalty is found to be unreasonable or if the evaluation of each factor is found to be incomplete, the hearing officer may recommend that the penalty be adjusted accordingly.

Any penalty imposed by the Department of Health and Human Services under this section shall commence on the date of the letter of notification of the penalty amount.

The Secretary may bring a civil action in the superior court of the county wherein the violation occurred to recover the amount of the administrative penalty whenever a facility:

Which has not requested an administrative hearing fails to pay the penalty within 60 days after being notified of the penalty, or

Which has requested an administrative hearing fails to pay the penalty within 60 days after receipt of a written copy of the decision as provided in

G.S. 150B-37

.

In lieu of assessing all or some of the administrative penalty, the Secretary may order a facility to provide staff training, or consider the approval of training completed by the facility after the violation, if all of the following criteria are met:

The training is determined by the Department to be specific to the violation.

The training is approved by the Department.

The training is taught by someone approved by the Department.

The facility has corrected the violation and continues to remain in compliance with the regulation.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in accordance with State law.

In considering renewal of a license, the Department shall not renew a license if outstanding fines and penalties imposed by the Department against the facility or program have not been paid. Fines and penalties for which an appeal is pending are exempt from consideration for nonrenewal under this subsection.

History.

2000-55, s. 4; 2005-276, ss. 10.40A(e), 10.40A(f); 2011-249, s. 1; 2011-398, s. 39; 2016-50, s. 1.

§ 122C-25.
Inspections; confidentiality.

The Secretary shall make or cause to be made inspections that the Secretary considers necessary. Facilities licensed under this Article shall be subject to inspection at all times by the Secretary. All residential facilities as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14)e. shall be inspected on an annual basis.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 8-53

,

G.S. 8-53.3

or any other law relating to confidentiality of communications involving a patient or client, in the course of an inspection conducted under this section, representatives of the Secretary may review any writing or other record concerning the admission, discharge, medication, treatment, medical condition, or history of any individual who is or has been a patient, resident, or client of a licensable facility and the personnel records of those individuals employed by the licensable facility.A licensable facility, its employees, and any other individual interviewed in the course of an inspection are immune from liability for damages resulting from disclosure of any information to the Secretary.Except as required by law, it is unlawful for the Secretary or an employee of the Department to disclose the following information to someone not authorized to receive the information:

Any confidential or privileged information obtained under this section unless the client or his legally responsible person authorizes disclosure in writing; or

The name of anyone who has furnished information concerning a licensable facility without the individual’s consent.Violation of this subsection is a Class 3 misdemeanor punishable only by a fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).All confidential or privileged information obtained under this section and the names of persons providing this information are exempt from Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

The Secretary shall adopt rules regarding inspections, that, at a minimum, provide for:

A general administrative schedule for inspections; and

An unscheduled inspection without notice, if there is a complaint alleging the violation of any licensing rule adopted under this Article.

All residential facilities, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14)e., shall ensure that the Division of Health Service Regulation complaint hotline number is posted conspicuously in a public place in the facility.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 918; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2005-276, ss. 10.40A(g), 10.40A(h); 2007-182, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, ss. 10.40A(g) and 10.40A(h), effective July 1, 2007, added the second sentence in subsection (a); and added subsection (d). For applicability, see Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 1, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Division of Health Service Regulation” for “Division of Facility Services” in subsection (d).

§ 122C-26.
Powers of the Commission.

In addition to other powers and duties, the Commission shall exercise the following powers and duties:

Adopt, amend, and repeal rules consistent with the laws of this State and the laws and regulations of the federal government to implement the provisions and purposes of this Article;

Issue declaratory rulings needed to implement the provisions and purposes of this Article;

Adopt rules governing appeals of decisions to approve or deny licensure under this Article;

Adopt rules for the waiver of rules adopted under this Article; and

Adopt rules applicable to facilities licensed under this Article that do the following:

Establishing personnel requirements of staff employed in facilities.

Establishing qualifications of facility administrators or directors.

Establishing requirements for death reporting including confidentiality provisions related to death reporting.

Establishing requirements for patient advocates.

Requiring facility personnel who refer clients to provider agencies to disclose any pecuniary interest the referring person has in the provider agency, or other interest that may give rise to the appearance of impropriety.

Establishing standardized procedures for facilities in training and record keeping of the measures taken to inform employees and volunteers of the duties imposed by

G.S. 122C-66

.

Adopt rules providing for the licensure and accreditation of residential treatment facilities that provide services to persons with traumatic brain injury.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2000-55, s. 5; 2005-276, s. 10.33; 2009-361, s. 1; 2015-36, s. 1.

§ 122C-27.
Powers of the Secretary.

The Secretary shall have the power to do all of the following:

Administer and enforce the provisions, rules, and decisions pursuant to this Article.

Appoint hearing officers to conduct appeals under this Article.

Prescribe by rule the contents of the application for licensure and renewal.

Inspect facilities and records of each facility to be licensed under this Article under the rules and decisions pursuant to this Article.

Issue a license upon a finding that the applicant and facility comply with the provisions of this Article and the rules of the Commission and the Secretary.

Define by rule procedures for submission of periodic reports by facilities licensed under this Article.

Grant, deny, suspend, or revoke a license under this Article.

(7a)

Issue orders directing facilities not licensed under this Article that are providing services requiring a license under this Article to cease and desist from engaging in any act or practice in violation of the provisions of this Article.

In accordance with rules of the Commission, make final agency decisions for appeals from the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license in accordance with

G.S. 122C-24

.

In accordance with rules of the Commission, grant waiver for good cause of any rules implementing this Article that do not affect the health, safety, or welfare of individuals within a licensable facility.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2021-77, s. 7.1(c).

§ 122C-28.
Penalties.

Operating a licensable facility without a license is a Class H felony, including a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day that the facility is in operation in violation of this Article.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 919; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2021-77, s. 7.2(a).

§ 122C-28.1.
Facilities in violation of this Article.

If the Department has directed a facility not licensed under this Article that is providing services requiring a license under this Article to cease and desist from engaging in any act or practice in violation of this Article, then the Department shall conduct a follow-up visit to determine if the Secretary may issue a cease and desist order pursuant to

G.S. 122C-27

, unless a cease and desist order has already been issued.

The district attorney’s office with jurisdiction over the facility shall collect information on the total amount of fines collected pursuant to

G.S. 122C-28

and report that information to the Department.

History.

2021-77, s. 7.1(a).

§ 122C-29.
Injunction.

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the Secretary may, in the way provided by law, maintain an action in the name of the State for injunction or other process against any person to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management, or operation of a licensable facility operating without a license or in a way that threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the individuals in the licensable facility.

If any individual interferes with the proper performance or duty of the Secretary in carrying out this Article, the Secretary may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the interference occurred for injunctive relief against the continued interference, irrespective of all other remedies at law.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-30.
Peer review committee; immunity from liability; confidentiality.

For purposes of peer review functions of a facility licensed under the provisions of this Chapter:

A member of a duly appointed peer review committee or quality assurance committee who acts without malice or fraud shall not be subject to liability for damages in any civil action on account of any act, statement, or proceeding undertaken, made, or performed within the scope of the functions of the committee; and

Proceedings of a peer review or quality assurance committee, the records and materials it produces, and the material it considers shall be confidential and not considered public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

, “Public records’ defined,” and shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action against a facility or a provider of professional health services that results from matters which are the subject of evaluation and review by the committee. No person who was in attendance at a meeting of the committee shall be required to testify in any civil action as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the proceedings of the committee or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of the committee or its members. However, information, documents or records otherwise available are not immune from discovery or use in a civil action merely because they were presented during proceedings of the committee, and nothing herein shall prevent a provider of professional health services from using such otherwise available information, documents or records in connection with an administrative hearing or civil suit relating to the medical staff membership, clinical privileges or employment of the provider. Documents otherwise available as public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

do not lose their status as public records merely because they were presented or considered during proceedings of the committee. A member of the committee or a person who testifies before the committee may be subpoenaed and be required to testify in a civil action as to events of which the person has knowledge independent of the peer review or quality assurance process, but cannot be asked about the person’s testimony before the committee for impeachment or other purposes or about any opinions formed as a result of the committee hearings.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1053, s. 2; 2004-149, s. 2.8.

Cross References.

As to provisions pertaining to medical review committees, see

G.S. 131E-95

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-149, s. 2.8, effective August 2, 2004, substituted “facility” for “hospital” in the first sentence; inserted “or quality assurance committee” in subdivision (1); in subdivision (2), inserted “or quality assurance” in the first sentence, inserted the fourth sentence, and in the last sentence, inserted “or quality assurance” preceding “process,” and substituted gender neutral language.

§ 122C-31.
Report required upon death of client.

A facility shall notify the Secretary immediately upon the death of any client of the facility that occurs within seven days of physical restraint or seclusion of the client, and shall notify the Secretary within three days of the death of any client of the facility resulting from violence, accident, suicide, or homicide. The Secretary may assess a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) against a facility that fails to notify the Secretary of a death and the circumstances surrounding the death known to the facility. Chapter 150B of the General Statutes governs the assessment of a penalty under this section. A civil penalty owed under this section may be recovered in a civil action brought by the Secretary or the Attorney General. The clear proceeds of the penalty shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in accordance with State law.

Upon receipt of notification from a facility in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary shall notify the State protection and advocacy agency designated under the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act 2000, 42 U.S.C. § 15001, et seq., that a person with a disability has died. The Secretary shall provide the agency access to the information about each death reported pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, including information resulting from any investigation of the death by the Department and from reports received from the Chief Medical Examiner pursuant to

G.S. 130A-385

. The agency shall use the information in accordance with its powers and duties under applicable State and federal law and regulations.

If the death of a client of a facility occurs within seven days of the use of physical restraint or seclusion, then the Secretary shall initiate immediately an investigation of the death.

An inpatient psychiatric unit of a hospital licensed under Chapter 131E of the General Statutes shall comply with this section.

Nothing in this section abrogates State or federal law or requirements pertaining to the confidentiality, privilege, or other prohibition against disclosure of information provided to the Secretary or the agency. In carrying out the requirements of this section, the Secretary and the agency shall adhere to State and federal requirements of confidentiality, privilege, and other prohibitions against disclosure and release applicable to the information received under this section. A facility or provider that makes available confidential information in accordance with this section and with State and federal law is not liable for the release of the information.

The Secretary shall establish a standard reporting format for reporting deaths pursuant to this section and shall provide to facilities subject to this section a form for the facility’s use in complying with this section.

In addition to the reporting requirements specified in subsections (a) through (e) of this section, and pursuant to

G.S. 130A-383

, every State facility shall report, without redactions other than to protect confidential personnel information, the death of any client of the facility, and, if known, the death of any former client of a facility who dies within 14 days of release from the facility, regardless of the manner of death:

To the medical examiner of the county in which the body of the deceased is found; and

To the State protection and advocacy agency designated under the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act 2000, 42 U.S.C. § 15001, et seq. The State protection and advocacy agency shall use the information in accordance with its powers and duties under applicable State or federal law and regulations.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 122C-52

, and unless otherwise prohibited by State or federal law or requirements, in order to provide for greater transparency in connection with the reporting requirements specified in subsections (a) through (g) of this section, the following information in reports made pursuant to this section shall be public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

when reported by a State facility:

The name, sex, age, and date of birth of the deceased.

The name of the facility providing the report.

The date, time, and location of the death.

A brief description of the circumstances of death, including the manner of death, if known.

A list of all entities to whom the event was reported.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 122C-22

, all facilities, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14), shall comply with this section.

History.

2000-129, s. 3(a); 2007-323, ss. 19.1(e), (f); 2008-131, s. 1; 2009-299, ss. 1-4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 19.1(e), (f), substituted “the agency” for “the Council” throughout subsections (b) and (e); in subsection (b), substituted “State protection and advocacy agency designated under the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act 2000, P.L. 106-402” for “Governor’s Advocacy Council for Persons with Disabilities” in the first sentence, and substituted “duties under applicable State and federal law” for “duties under G.S. 143B-403.1 and applicable federal law” in the last sentence. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2008-131, s. 1, effective July 28, 2008, added subsection (g).

Session Laws 2009-299, ss. 1 to 4, effective July 17, 2009, in subsection (b), substituted “42 U.S.C. § 15001, et seq.” for “P.L. 106-402”; rewrote subsection (g); and added subsections (h) and (i).

§ 122C-32.
Patient visitation rights for residents of residential treatment facilities.

Any facility licensed under this Chapter shall allow clients to receive visitors of their choice to the fullest extent permitted under the infection and prevention control program of the facility and applicable guidelines or orders issued by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the Department, local health departments, or any other government public health agency.

In the event the Department finds a facility has violated any rule, regulation, guidance, directive, or law relating to a client’s visitation rights, the Department may issue a warning to the facility about the violation and give the facility not more than 24 hours to allow visitation. If visitation is not allowed after the 24-hour warning period, the Department shall impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each instance on each day the facility was found to have a violation. This civil penalty shall be in addition to any licensure action, fine, or civil penalty that the Department may impose pursuant to this Chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, in the event that circumstances require the complete closure of a facility to visitors, the facility shall use its best efforts to develop alternate visitation protocols that would allow visitation to the greatest extent safely possible. If those alternate protocols are found by the Department, the local health departments, or any other government public health agency to violate any rule, regulation, guidance, or federal law relating to a client’s visitation rights, the Department may impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each instance on each day the facility was found to have a violation. This civil penalty shall be in addition to any fine or civil penalty that the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other federal agency may choose to impose and any licensure action, fine, or civil penalty that the Department may impose pursuant to this Chapter.

Each facility shall provide notice of the client visitation rights in this act to clients and, when possible, family members of clients. The required notice shall also include the contact information for the agency or individuals tasked with investigating violations of facility client visitation.

Subject to, and to the fullest extent permitted by, any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law, each facility shall allow compassionate care visits. The facility may require compassionate care visitors to submit to health screenings necessary to prevent the spread of infectious diseases, and, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the facility may restrict a compassionate care visitor who does not pass a health screening requirement or who has tested positive for an infectious disease. The facility may require compassionate care visitors to adhere to infection control procedures, including wearing personal protective equipment. Compassionate care situations that require visits include, but are not limited to, the following:

End-of-life situations.

A resident who was living with his or her family before recently being admitted to the facility is struggling with the change in environment and lack of physical family support.

A resident who is grieving after a friend or family member recently passed away.

A resident who needs cueing and encouragement with eating or drinking, previously provided by family or caregivers, is experiencing weight loss or dehydration.

A resident, who used to talk and interact with others, is experiencing emotional distress, seldom speaking, or crying more frequently when the resident had rarely cried in the past.

History.

2021-171, s. 6; 2021-181, s. 2(f).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-171 provides in its preamble: “Whereas, the COVID-19 pandemic has caused great uncertainty and anxiety across our State and has significantly affected patients and residents in health care facilities; and

“Whereas, health care facilities have made many efforts to keep patients and employees in a safe environment and have endeavored to minimize, to the extent possible, the risk of spread of the coronavirus disease; and

“Whereas, as a result of COVID-19 prevention measures, many unintended consequences have occurred to patients and residents of these facilities who were not diagnosed with COVID-19; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly has become aware of numerous patients and residents of health care facilities across our State who were not diagnosed with COVID-19, but as a result of visitation policies have been prohibited from having any visitors, including a spouse, parent, close family member, guardian, health care agent, or caregiver; and

“Whereas, many families have been unable to be physically present with their loved ones while in a hospital, nursing home, combination home, hospice care, adult care home, special care unit, or residential treatment setting for mental illness, developmental or intellectual disability, or substance use disorder, and have been limited to electronic video communications, if any, with the patient; and

“Whereas, the patients and residents who have been affected in the above_described manner have included adults, minors, and individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that it is in the interest of the State and its residents that these patients and residents of health care facilities, in compliance with the rules, regulations, and guidelines of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and federal law, should not be denied visitation by visitors of their choosing throughout the period of hospitalization or residential treatment; Now, therefore,”

Session Laws
2021-171, s. 1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The No Patient Left Alone Act.’”

Session Laws 2021-171, s. 7, made this section, as added by Session Laws 2021-171, s. 6, effective November 1, 2021.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-181, s. 2(f), effective November 1, 2021, in the first sentence of subsection (e), added “Subject to, and to the fullest extent…Prevention or any federal law” at the beginning, and made a related change.

§§ 122C-33 through 122C-50.

Reserved for future codification purposes.